Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.800

General policies.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5752-S.SL) ***

(1) The department shall establish and implement policies in the working connections child care program to promote stability and quality of care for children from low-income households. These policies shall focus on supporting school readiness for young learners. Policies for the expenditure of funds constituting the working connections child care program must be consistent with the outcome measures established by the department and the standards established in this section intended to promote stability, quality, and continuity of early care and education programming.

(2) As recommended by P.L. 113-186, authorizations for the working connections child care subsidy are effective for 12 months.

(a) A household's 12-month authorization begins on the date that child care is expected to begin.

(b) If a newly eligible household does not begin care within 12 months of being determined eligible by the department, the household must reapply in order to qualify for subsidy.

(3)(a) The department must extend the homeless grace period, as adopted in department rule as of January 1, 2020, from a four-month grace period to a 12-month grace period.

(b) For the purposes of this subsection, "homeless" means being without a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime residence as described in the federal McKinney-Vento homeless assistance act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a) as it existed on January 1, 2020.

(4) For purposes of this section, "authorization" means a transaction created by the department that allows a child care provider to claim payment for care. The department may adjust an authorization based on a household's eligibility status.

[ 2024 c 67 s 1. Prior: 2023 c 294 s 1; 2023 c 222 s 3; 2021 c 199 s 202; 2020 c 279 s 2. Formerly RCW 43.216.136.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 222 s 3: "Section 3 of this act takes effect October 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 222 s 6.]

Findings—Intent—2023 c 222: See note following RCW 43.216.812.

Effective date—2021 c 199 ss 201, 202, 301, 309, and 504: See note following RCW 43.216.802.

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.

Effective date—2020 c 279: "This act takes effect July 1, 2020." [ 2020 c 279 s 4.]